Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Address" means a residential street address, school address, or work address of an individual, as specified on the individual's application to be a program participant under this chapter.

(2) "Domestic violence" means an act as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and includes a threat of such acts committed against an individual in a domestic situation, regardless of whether these acts or threats have been reported to law enforcement officers.

(3) "Program participant" means a person certified as a program participant under RCW 40.24.030.

(4) "Stalking" means an act defined in RCW 9A.46.110 and includes a threat of such acts committed against an individual, regardless of whether these acts or threats have been reported to law enforcement officers.

(5) "Trafficking" means an act as defined in RCW 9A.40.100 or an act recognized as a severe form of trafficking under 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7102(8) as it existed on June 12, 2008, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the secretary of state by rule, consistent with the purposes of this subsection, regardless of whether the act has been reported to law enforcement.

[ 2008 c 312 s 2; 2008 c 18 s 1; 1991 c 23 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2008 c 18 s 1 and by 2008 c 312 s 2, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).